Louisiana, session 2026, SB470.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:744.3(A), the introductory paragraph of 744.3(B) and 744.3(C)(3),
and 744.5(2) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 15:744.5(7) and 744.9 are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§744.3. Restraint during childbirth pregnancy and postpartum recovery
A. Restraints shall not be used on a pregnant prisoner while she is in labor
and during delivery unless a member of the medical staff orders therapeutic restraints
for a prisoner who, due to a psychiatric or medical disorder, is a danger to herself,
her child, her unborn child, or other persons. For purposes of this Section,
"therapeutic restraints" shall not include metal handcuffs or shackles.
B. No restraints shall be used on a prisoner known to be pregnant during any
pregnancy-related medical distress, or while she is being transported to a medical
facility or the Louisiana Correctional Institute for Women for prenatal care,
delivery, or any pregnancy-related medical distress, or during postpartum recovery,
unless there are compelling grounds to believe that the prisoner presents either of the
following:
* * *
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 470 ENROLLED
C. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section:
* * *
(3) Under no circumstances shall waist restraints or shackles be used on any
pregnant prisoner during transportation to a medical facility or postpartum recovery.
* * *
§744.5. Definitions
For purposes of this Part:
* * *
(2) "Postpartum" means the period following delivery before a prisoner or
detainee has been discharged from a medical facility that begins immediately after
childbirth and lasts for no less than six weeks. The medical professional treating
the pregnant prisoner after childbirth may extend the postpartum period
beyond six weeks based on his medical judgment if it is medically necessary to
ensure recovery.
* * *
(7) "Therapeutic restraint" means flex cuffs or soft restraints.
* * *
§744.9. Pregnancy testing
A. During the intake process at every state and local correctional facility,
a pregnancy test shall be offered to each woman aged fifty-five years or younger
who is arrested and taken into custody.
B. The woman's consent or refusal to take a pregnancy test and the
result of any test administered shall be documented.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health shall identify available
pregnancy test funding sources from nonprofit organizations or federal grants
for the purposes of this Section.
D. For purposes of this Section, "correctional facility" includes state,
parish, and municipal facilities including jails, detention centers, and prisons.
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Arts. 893(A)(5), 894.1(B)(34), and 894.6 are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 470 ENROLLED
Art. 893. Suspension and deferral of sentence and probation in felony cases
A.(1)(a) * * *
* * *
(5) In determining whether to suspend the imposition or execution of
sentence and place a defendant on probation, the court may consider, among
other relevant factors, whether the defendant is pregnant at the time of
sentencing and whether participation in a medically appropriate prenatal care
program, residential treatment program, or substance use disorder treatment
program would serve the interests of justice and public safety, consistent with
existing law.
* * *
Art. 894.1. Sentencing guidelines; generally
* * *
B. The following grounds, while not controlling the discretion of the court,
shall be accorded weight in its determination of suspension of sentence or probation:
* * *
(34) Whether the defendant is pregnant at the time of sentencing and
whether an alternative sentence involving community-based supervision and
participation in a prenatal care, maternal health, or substance use disorder
treatment program would be appropriate, consistent with existing law.
* * *
Art. 894.6. Sentencing considerations and conditions of probation for pregnant
defendants
A. Nothing in this Article shall be construed to authorize the suspension
of sentence or probation for any offense for which such relief is otherwise
prohibited by law. This Article shall not be interpreted to expand or modify
eligibility for probation or suspension of sentence.
B. For any defendant who is pregnant at the time of sentencing and is
otherwise eligible for suspension of sentence or probation under existing law,
the court may consider the provisions of this Article.
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 470 ENROLLED
C. For a defendant described in Paragraph B of this Article, the court
may suspend the imposition or execution of sentence and place the defendant
on probation in accordance with existing law, and may require, as a condition
of probation, that the defendant:
(1) Participate in and successfully complete a court-approved prenatal
care program, pregnancy support program, or maternal health program.
(2) Participate in and successfully complete a residential or outpatient
substance use disorder treatment program, including medically supervised
detoxification when appropriate.
(3) Comply with all recommended prenatal and postnatal medical care.
(4) Participate in parenting education, life skills training, or case
management services as deemed appropriate by the court.
(5) Comply with any additional conditions of probation authorized by
law.
D. In determining whether to impose a sentence pursuant to this Article,
the court shall consider public safety, the nature of the offense, the criminal
history of the defendant, and the availability of appropriate programs.
E. The Louisiana Department of Health shall maintain and make
available to courts, upon request, a list of publicly and privately available
programs that may satisfy the requirements of this Article.
Section 3.(A) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the state of Louisiana has
a compelling interest in protecting maternal health, promoting healthy births, and supporting
family stability.
(B) Pregnant defendants in the criminal justice system may present unique medical
and rehabilitative needs that can, in appropriate cases, be addressed through
community-based supervision and treatment.
(C) It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that courts may consider pregnancy as
a relevant factor at sentencing and, where a defendant is otherwise eligible under existing
law, utilize appropriate alternatives to incarceration.
(D) Nothing in this Act is intended to expand or modify eligibility for probation or
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 470 ENROLLED
suspension of sentence as otherwise provided by law.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.